test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s2x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - skjóla: # 
    skjóla+V+Inf: skjóla
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skjólir
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skjólar
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: skjólaði
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skjóltu
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skjólaðu
    skjóla+V+Sup: skjólt
    skjóla+V+Sup: skjólað
    skjóla+V+PrfPrc: skjólaður
